District of Columbia statutes.
8-1041.10

Reporting requirements.

(a)

On March 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the Mayor shall submit a report to the Council regarding implementation of the provisions in this chapter and estimating, based on best available information, the progress the District has made toward achieving the goal outlined in § 8-1041.02. The annual reports shall be posted on the Mayor’s website by April 1 of each year.

(b)

By March 1, 2019, the Mayor shall submit a report to the Council analyzing the effectiveness of the provisions outlined in this chapter in meeting the goal established in § 8-1041.02, and recommending any changes necessary to ensure that the goal may be met as early as possible. The report shall further advise the Council whether the convenient collection service alternative to the minimum collection share requirement allowed under § 8-1041.05(a)(3) has generated per capita collection rates similar to the best performing electronics waste programs in other jurisdictions, considering relevant differences in covered electronic equipment and the electronics waste stream.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 124, 61 DCR 9971